District of Columbia statutes.
38-107

Supervisor of Manual Training.

There shall be appointed by the Board a Supervisor of Manual Training who, under the direction of the Superintendent, shall have supervision of manual training instruction.

History

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 317, ch. 3446, § 3(6)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(d)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-111.
1973 Ed., § 31-111.